Utah statutes.
32B-13-203.   Renewal requirements for beer wholesaling license.

(1)  A beer wholesaling license expires on December 31 of each year.

(2)  To renew a beer wholesaling license, a person shall submit to the department by no later than November 30 of the year the license expires:

(a)  a completed renewal application in a form prescribed by the department; and

(b)  a renewal fee in the following amount:



Case Sales in Previous License Year for the Licensee

Renewal Fee





under 500,000 cases

$1,200





equals or exceeds 500,000 cases but less than 1,000,000 cases

$2,350





equals or exceeds 1,000,000 cases

$3,500.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the beer wholesaling license effective on the date the existing beer wholesaling license expires.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

